California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
======================================================================
  Military and Veterans Code
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Last Updated by State of California: September 26, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

GENERAL PROVISIONS

1.

This act shall be known as the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

2.

The provisions of this code in so far as they are substantially the same as existing statutes relating to the same subject matter shall be construed as restatements and continuations thereof, and not as new enactments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

3.

All persons who, at the time this code goes into effect, hold office under any of the acts repealed by this code, which offices are continued by this code, shall continue to hold the same according to the former tenure thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

No action or proceeding commenced before this code takes effect, and no right accrued, is affected by the provisions of this code, but all procedure thereafter taken therein shall conform to the provisions of this code so far as possible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the general provisions hereinafter set forth shall govern the construction of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

Division, part, chapter, and article headings contained herein shall not be deemed to govern, limit, modify, or in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of any portion of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

Whenever, by the provisions of this code, a power is granted to a public officer or a duty imposed upon such an officer, the power may be exercised or duty performed by a deputy of the officer or by a person authorized pursuant to law by the officer, unless it is expressly otherwise provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

8.

Writing includes any form of recorded message capable of comprehension by ordinary visual means. Whenever any notice, report, statement or record is required by this code, it shall be made in writing in the English language unless it is otherwise expressly provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

Whenever any reference is made to any section of this code or to any law of this State or the United States or to the Articles of War or the rules and regulations of the United States Army or Navy departments, such reference shall apply to all amendments and additions thereto now or hereafter made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

“Section” means section of this code unless some other statute is specifically mentioned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

The present tense includes the past and future tenses; and the future, the present.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

The singular number includes the plural, and the plural the singular.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

13.

“County” includes city and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

14.

“Shall” is mandatory and “may” is permissive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

15.

“Oath” includes affirmation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

16.

An oath authorized or required by Division 2 of this code or the regulations issued thereunder or the statutes or regulations governing the United States Army or United States Navy or United States Air Force or the National Guard or the Air National Guard or active militia may be taken before the following persons who are authorized to administer the same within and without the State, namely: all officers and persons authorized to administer oaths by the 136th Article of the Uniform Code of Military Justice adopted by Section 102 as part of this code, the Adjutant General, the Assistant Adjutant General, the administrative officer in the Office of the Adjutant General, officers of the National Guard when such oath is authorized or required in a matter pertaining to the National Guard, and officers of the Naval Militia when such oath is authorized or required in a matter pertaining to the Naval Militia, except officers of both land and naval forces on the reserve and retired list while unassigned to duty, or by any other officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of this State. No charge shall be made for the same.

In other cases where an oath is required by this code, the same may be administered by persons authorized to do so by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 193.)
-------------------------------------------

17.

“Signature” or “subscription” includes mark when the signer or subscriber cannot write, such signer’s or subscriber’s name being written near the mark by a witness who writes his own name near the signer’s or subscriber’s name; but a signature or subscription by mark may be acknowledged or may serve as a signature or subscription to a sworn statement only when two witnesses so sign the same.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

18.

Whenever used in this code, in specifying or defining the rights of employees of the State, or of any county, city and county, city, public district of any type or class, or other public or municipal corporation who are absent from their duties as such employees while in the active military service of the United States of America or of the State of California, or while assigned to duty with the military forces of the United States of America or of the State of California in the full time paid service of the American Red Cross, the word “war” shall mean: (a) whenever Congress has declared war and peace has not been formally restored; (b) whenever the United States is engaged in active military operations against any foreign power, whether or not war has been formally declared; or (c) whenever the United States is assisting the United Nations, in actions involving the use of armed force, to restore international peace and security.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

19.

“Spouse” includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 64.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. ADMINISTRATION OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS [50. - 91.]



CHAPTER 1. The Military Department [50. - 59.]

50.

There shall be in the State Government the Military Department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

51.

The Military Department includes the office of the Adjutant General, the California National Guard, the State Guard, the California Cadet Corps, and the Naval Militia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 10.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

52.

The Adjutant General succeeds to, and is vested with, the duties, power, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the Division of Military Affairs and of the officers and employees of that division. The Adjutant General shall, in addition to all other duties, be the head of the Military Department and shall be responsible for its affairs, functions, duties, funds, and property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

52.5.

The Adjutant General may enter into agreements to provide for joint and several liability and indemnity to private agencies and persons for injuries to third parties arising out of a negligent act or omission by a member of the California National Guard while involved in on-the-job training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 517, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

53.

The creation of the Military Department shall in no manner affect the status, position, pay, classification, rights, duties, obligations, responsibilities, or tenure, as the same exist on the effective date of this act, of any person, employee, appointee, officer, enlisted person, warrant officer or commissioned officer employed, enlisted or appointed by or on duty with or in the service of the Office of the Adjutant General or the Adjutant General or the National Guard or the State Guard or the California Cadet Corps or the Naval Militia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 11.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

53.5.

(a) The Military Department may require service members, employees, volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) The Military Department shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(c) As used in this section, “service member” means a
 member of the active militia as defined in Section 120 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 31.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

54.

All unexpended balances appropriated for the use of the office of the Adjutant General, the Adjutant General, the National Guard, the State Guard or the Naval Militia and not required by the office of the Adjutant General, the Adjutant General, the National Guard, the State Guard or the Naval Militia may be expended by the Adjutant General for the use and benefit of the Military Department.
 Except as herein provided, all money and funds available to or appropriated for the use and benefit of the office of the Adjutant General, the Adjutant General, the National Guard, the State Guard, the California Cadet Corps or the Naval Militia, upon the effective date of this act, shall not be affected by the creation of the Military Department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 12.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

55.

(a) A person serving in the position of inspector general shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

(1) Be appointed by the Governor, with consideration of the recommendation of the Adjutant General and notification to the Senate Committee on Rules, and shall serve a four-year term from the effective date of appointment. The inspector general shall not be removed from office during that term, except for good cause. An inspector general shall not serve more than two consecutive terms.

(2) Meet the same qualifications established in this code for the Assistant Adjutant General.

(3) Be an advisor to the Governor and responsive to the Adjutant General and serve on state active duty at the grade of O-6 or higher.

(b) (1) The inspector general may not serve as the Adjutant General or the Assistant Adjutant General for four years from the date of leaving the position of inspector general.

(2) A commissioned officer on state active duty appointed to the position of inspector general who, immediately prior to that duty, held a permanent state active duty position shall remain on state active duty upon vacating the inspector general position.

(3) The inspector general, as soon as able after their appointment, shall attend the Department of Defense Inspector General School.

(c) The department shall, from the amount annually appropriated to it for purposes of this office, continue to fund the position of inspector general.

(d) The inspector general shall have access to all employees and documents of the department.

(e) The inspector general may receive communications from any person, including, but not limited to, any member of the department.

(f) The inspector general shall, at a minimum, continue to perform the functions of inspections, assistance, investigations, and teaching and training. The functions of the inspector general shall be performed in accordance with applicable service laws, rules, and regulations
 governing federal inspectors general.

(g) The inspector general shall continue to maintain a toll-free public telephone number and an internet website to receive complaints and allegations, including, but not limited to, those described in subdivision (h) or the California Military Whistleblower Protection Act. The inspector general shall continue to post the telephone number and internet website in clear view at every California National Guard armory, flight facility, airfield, or installation.

(h) (1) At the discretion of the inspector general or the Adjutant General, or upon a written request by the Governor, a Member of the Legislature, any member of the department, or any member of the public, the inspector general shall, in compliance with Army Regulation
 20-1 or any subsequent regulation governing activities and procedures of the inspector general, expeditiously investigate any complaint or allegation regarding the following:

(A) A violation of law, including, but not limited to, regulations, the Uniform Code of Military Justice, and any law prohibiting sexual harassment or unlawful discrimination.

(B) Gross mismanagement, a gross waste of funds, an abuse of authority, or a substantial and specified danger to the public health or safety.

(2) (A) For all written requests submitted by a Member of the Legislature, the inspector general shall respond in writing with the inspector general’s findings. The response shall contain only that information that
 may be lawfully disclosed, and, if a complaint or allegation is at issue, the response shall contain, at a minimum, information regarding whether the complaint or allegation was unfounded or sustained.

(B) If the inspector general conducts an investigation at the request of a Member of the Legislature, the inspector general shall submit to that member a report of the inspector general’s findings of that investigation. The report shall contain only information that may be lawfully disclosed, and shall contain, at a minimum, information regarding whether the complaint or allegations were unfounded or sustained.

(3) The inspector general shall notify a person who submitted a request for investigation pursuant to paragraph (1) of the results of the investigation, with respect to
 those issues and allegations directly pertaining to, or made by, the person.

(4) (A) A request described in paragraph (1) is not a public record and is not subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act set forth in Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(B) The inspector general shall not disclose to any person or entity the identity of a person making a written request or an allegation or complaint described in paragraph (1), unless the person making the request, allegation, or complaint has consented to the disclosure in writing.

(5) (A) When deemed appropriate by the inspector general, the inspector general may refer to
 the Chief of the National Guard Bureau any complaints or allegations described in paragraph (1), any violations of the Uniform Code of Military Justice, or any violations of any other state or federal law.

(B) When deemed appropriate by the inspector general, the inspector general may refer to the State Auditor any complaints or allegations described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) or any violation of state or federal law.

(i) If the inspector general receives, or becomes aware of, an allegation, complaint, or misconduct regarding the Adjutant General or the Assistant Adjutant General, the inspector general shall immediately refer the matter to the Chief of the National Guard Bureau and the Governor for review. The inspector general, by order of the Governor, shall conduct
 an investigation regarding the allegations concerning the Adjutant General or the Assistant Adjutant General concurrently with any federal investigation where appropriate. The inspector general shall report the findings to the Governor under this subdivision.

(j) If the inspector general receives, or becomes aware of, an allegation, complaint, or instance of misconduct regarding an inspector general, the inspector general shall immediately refer the allegation, by rapid and confidential means, to the Governor and the next higher echelon inspector general for appropriate action within 10 working days after receipt.

(k) Any allegation presented to the inspector general against a person recognized by the federal government as grade E-8 or E-9, or against any officer recognized
 by the federal government as a rank of major through colonel, that resulted in the initiation of an inspector general investigation or investigative inquiry or a command-directed action, such as an investigation pursuant to Army Regulation 15-6, commander’s inquiry, or referral to the United States Army Criminal Investigation Command, shall be reported to the inspector general of the Department of the Army or the inspector general of the Department of the Air Force, as appropriate, and the Adjutant General within 10 working days after receipt.

(l) Any allegation presented to the inspector general against a person not recognized by the federal government as grade E-8 or E-9, or against any officer not recognized by the federal government as a rank of major through colonel, that resulted in the initiation of an inspector general
 investigation or investigative inquiry or a command-directed action, such as an investigation pursuant to Army Regulation 15-6, commander’s inquiry, or referral to the United States Army Criminal Investigation Command, shall be reported to the Governor and the Adjutant General within 10 working days after receipt.

(m) Any allegation presented to the inspector general against general officers or brigadier general selectees shall be reported, by rapid and confidential means, to the Governor and the Adjutant General within 10 working days after receipt.

(n) (1) (A) The inspector general shall, on or before July 1, 2013, and on or before July 1 each year thereafter, submit a report to the Governor, the Legislature, the Senate Committee on Military
 and Veterans Affairs, and the Assembly Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs. The report shall include, but not be limited to, a description of significant problems discovered by the office and a summary of investigations conducted by the office during the previous year. Upon submitting the report to the Governor, the Legislature, the Senate Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs, and the Assembly Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs the report shall be made available to the public and posted on the office’s internet website.

(B) A report to be submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Upon the completion of an investigation conducted by the inspector general pursuant to
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) or Section 56, the inspector general shall also prepare and issue on a quarterly basis a public report that includes all investigations completed in the previous quarter. The inspector general shall submit a copy of the quarterly report to the Legislature, the Senate Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs, and the Assembly Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs. The inspector general shall have the discretion to redact or otherwise protect the names of individuals, specific locations, or other facts that, if not redacted, might hinder prosecution under state or federal law or the Uniform Code of Military Justice related to the investigation, or where disclosure of the information is otherwise prohibited by law, and to decline to produce any of the underlying materials. In a case where allegations were deemed to be unfounded, all applicable identifying
 information shall be redacted. Each quarterly report shall be made available to the public and posted on the office’s internet website.

(o) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Department” means the Military Department.

(2) “Inspector general” means the California Military Department Inspector General.

(3) “Member of the department” means the Adjutant General, any person under the command of the Adjutant General, any person employed by the department, including, but not limited to, any
 servicemember or employee of the office of the Adjutant General, the California National Guard, the State Guard, the California Cadet Corps, or the Naval Militia, any person on state active duty, any person with a state commission, or any civil service or part-time employee of the department.

(4) “Office” means the Office of the California Military Department Inspector General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 328.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

56.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the “California Military Whistleblower Protection Act.”

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not do any of the following:

(1) (A) Restrict a member of the department from communicating with a Member of Congress, the Governor, a Member of the Legislature, or any state or federal inspector general.

(B) Subparagraph (A) shall not apply to a communication that is unlawful.

(2) Take, or threaten to take, an unfavorable
 personnel action, or withhold, or threaten to withhold, a favorable personnel action, as a reprisal against a member of the department for making a communication to any person, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) A Member of Congress.

(B) The Governor.

(C) A Member of the Legislature.

(D) The inspector general.

(E) The State Auditor.

(F) A federal inspector general or any other inspector general appointed under the Inspector General Act of 1978.

(G) Any member of a Department of Defense audit, inspection, investigation, or law enforcement organization.

(H) Any local, state, or federal law enforcement agency.

(I) Any person or organization in the chain of command of the department.

(J) Any other person or organization designated pursuant to regulation or any other established administrative procedures for communications of this type.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, if a member of the department submits to an inspector general an allegation that a personnel action prohibited by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) has been taken or has been threatened to be taken against the member of the
 department, the inspector general shall take action as provided by subdivision (d).

(d) An inspector general receiving an allegation pursuant to subdivision (c) shall do all of the following:

(1) Expeditiously determine whether there is sufficient evidence, in accordance with federal regulations governing federal inspectors general, to warrant an investigation of the allegation.

(2) Conduct a separate investigation of the information that the member making the allegation believes constitutes evidence of wrongdoing under both of the following circumstances:

(A) There has not been a previous investigation.

(B) There has been a previous investigation but the inspector general determines that the previous investigation was biased or otherwise inadequate.

(3) Upon determining that an investigation of an allegation is warranted, expeditiously investigate the allegation.

(e) The inspector general shall refer all allegations regarding personnel actions prohibited by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) to the Chief of the National Guard Bureau and the Governor.

(f) (1) After completion of an investigation the inspector general shall submit a report on the results of the investigation to the Adjutant General and a copy of the report on the results of the investigation to the member of the department who made the allegation.
 The report shall be transmitted to the Adjutant General, and the copy of the report shall be transmitted to the member, not later than 30 days after the completion of the investigation.

(2) The report on the results of the investigation transmitted to the Adjutant General shall contain a thorough review of the facts and circumstances relevant to the allegation and the complaint or disclosure and shall include documents acquired during the course of the investigation, including summaries of interviews conducted. The report may include a recommendation as to the disposition of the complaint.

(3) Except for that information that is not required to be disclosed under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code),
 in the copy of the report transmitted to the member of the department the inspector general shall ensure the maximum disclosure of information that may be lawfully disclosed. The copy of the report need not, however, include summaries of interviews conducted, or any document acquired, during the course of the investigation. These items shall be transmitted to the member of the department, if the member requests the items, with the copy of the report or after the transmittal to the member of the copy of the report, regardless of whether the request for those items is made before or after the copy of the report is transmitted to the member.

(4) The inspector general shall provide an interim response to allegations when the final response will be significantly delayed due to operational demands, complexity of the case, or the receipt of
 additional information. The inspector general shall provide interim responses every 60 days until the matter is resolved and the case closed.

(5) If, in the course of an investigation of an allegation under this section, the inspector general determines that it is not possible to submit the report required by this subdivision within 60 days after the date of receipt of the allegation being investigated, the inspector general shall provide to the Adjutant General and to the member making the allegation a notice of all of the following:

(A) The reasons why the report may not be submitted within that time.

(B) When the report will be submitted.

(g) Nothing in this
 article is intended to supersede the rights, benefits, processes, and procedures already afforded to members of the department under existing law.

(h) For purposes of this section, all of the following shall apply:

(1) A “communication” means any communication or report in which a member of the department complains of, or discloses information that the member of the department reasonably believes constitutes evidence of, any of the following:

(A) A violation of law, including, but not limited to, regulations, the Uniform Code of Military Justice, and any law prohibiting sexual harassment or unlawful discrimination.

(B) Gross mismanagement, a gross waste of funds, an
 abuse of authority, or a substantial and specified danger to the public health or safety.

(2) “Department” means the Military Department.

(3) “Inspector general” means the California Military Department Inspector General.

(4) “Member of the department” has the same meaning as defined in Section 55.

(5) “Office” means the Office of the California Military Department Inspector General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 329.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

56.1.

(a) A member of the department who intentionally engages in acts of reprisal, retaliation, threats, coercion, or similar acts against any other member or former member of the department, or employee of any department, board, or authority, for having disclosed what the member or former member of the department or employee in good faith believed to be improper activities in the Military Department shall be disciplined by the Governor or the Adjutant General, or by adverse action as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 19570) of Chapter 7 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, if applicable. If no adverse action is taken by the appointing power for a civil service or other state employee, the State Personnel Board shall begin procedures as if charges were filed pursuant to Section
 19583.5 of the Government Code.

(b) Persons subject to the Uniform Code of Military Justice (UCMJ) who violate Section 56 shall additionally be subject to punishment pursuant to Article 92 of the UCMJ, and subject to adverse administrative action as authorized by state law or federal law.

(c) Any member of the department who violates the prohibitions defined in Section 56 shall be subject to disciplinary action or criminal prosecution as authorized by state or federal law.

(d) For the purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Department” means the Military Department.

(2) “Employee” has the same meaning as defined in Section 8547.2 of the Government Code.

(3) “Improper activities” means the same thing as “improper governmental activity” under Section 8547.2 of the Government Code.

(4) “Member of the department” has the same meaning as defined in Section 55.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 704, Sec. 3.   (SB 481)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

57.

The Military Department shall provide, at a minimum, one training per year to the department’s civil service employees regarding the role and responsibility of the California Military Department Inspector General and their rights under the California Military Whistleblower Protection Act, the federal Military Whistleblower Protection Act, and any other relevant state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 731, Sec. 4.   (SB 921)   Effective September 28, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

58.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 9795 and 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before July 1 of each year, the department shall report the following information to the Governor, the Legislature, the Senate Committee on Veterans Affairs, and the Assembly Committee on Veterans Affairs, the Attorney General, and the United States Attorney for each district in California:

(1) For the previous federal fiscal year:

(A) The policies, procedures, and processes in place or implemented by the Sexual Assault Prevention and Response (SAPR) Program during that federal fiscal year in response to incidents of sexual assault and sexual harassment.

(B) An
 assessment of the implementation of the policies and procedures on the prevention, response, and oversight of sexual assaults and sexual harassment in the military to determine the effectiveness of SAPR policies and programs, including an assessment of how service efforts executed federal Department of Defense SAPR priorities.

(C) Matrices for restricted and unrestricted reports of the number of sexual assaults and sexual harassment involving service members, that includes case synopses, and disciplinary actions taken in substantiated cases and relevant information. Reporting on restricted cases shall be limited to aggregated statistical data so that the privacy of victims is protected. Reporting on unrestricted cases shall be limited to aggregated statistical data, but shall include, at a minimum, the following subcategories:

(i) Types of crimes.

(ii) Types of victims.

(iii) Status of investigations.

(iv) Status of prosecutions.

(v) Status of department administrative actions.

(D) Analyses of the matrices of the number of sexual assaults and sexual harassment allegations involving service members. The analyses shall include analysis of data and trends in comparison to state data from previous years and, to the degree possible, comparisons of state data and trends and data and trends from other branches and components of the United States Armed Forces, including both active and reserve components, including the National Guard of other states and territories.

(2) For the
 current federal fiscal year, any plans for the prevention of and response to sexual assault and sexual harassment, specifically in the areas of advocacy, healthcare provider and medical response, mental health, counseling, investigative services, legal services, and chaplain response.

(b) The department shall also make the information described in subdivision (a) available on its public internet website in the form of aggregated statistical data. In order to protect victims’ privacy, this information shall not include case synopses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 183, Sec. 2.   (SB 352)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

59.

(a) There is in the state government a Governor’s Military Council (council) that shall serve under the direction of the Military Department and consist of members appointed by the Governor. The council shall advise the Governor on efforts to retain military installations and operations within the state that are necessary for the defense of the nation, and to coordinate and focus those efforts.

(b) The council shall include, but not be limited to, bipartisan representatives from
 the Senate and Assembly. Senate representatives shall be nominated by the Senate Committee on Rules, and Assembly representatives shall be nominated by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1,
 2031, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 199, Sec. 1.   (AB 1508)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Department of Veterans Affairs [60. - 91.]

60.

As used in this chapter, “department” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1946, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 114.)
-------------------------------------------

61.

As used in this chapter, “board” means the California Veterans Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1946, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 114.)
-------------------------------------------

62.

As used in this code, “secretary” means the Secretary of Veterans Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 261, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

63.

There is in the state government a Department of Veterans Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 238, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

64.

There shall be a California Veterans Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 183, Sec. 1.   (SB 1387)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

65.

The California Veterans Board shall consist of seven members who shall be appointed by the Governor subject to the confirmation of the Senate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 219, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

66.

All members of the board shall be veterans as “veteran” is defined in Section 18540.4 of the Government Code. One of these members shall also be retired from the active or reserve forces of the United States military service. One of these members shall also be a resident of a California veterans home. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit a member of the board who does not meet this requirement from serving the remainder of their term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66.5.

(a) Every member of the board shall be a member in good standing with a congressionally chartered veteran service organization.

(b) One member of the board shall have substantial training, professional knowledge, or experience in the issues faced by female veterans which may include, but are not limited to, the following issues:

(1) Combat-related disorders.

(2) Sexual trauma.

(3) Homelessness.

(c) This section does not prohibit
 any member of the board from serving the remainder of their term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 2.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

67.

(a) Of the members as appointed, except as provided in subdivision (b), one shall be appointed for a term expiring January 15, 1947, two for terms expiring January 15, 1948, two for terms expiring January 15, 1949, and two for terms expiring January 15, 1950. Subsequent appointments shall be for terms of four years.

(b) The member of the board who is a resident of a California veterans home shall be appointed for a term expiring January 15 of an odd-numbered year. Subsequent appointments shall be made on a rotational basis based on the age of the home, beginning with the oldest veterans home with independent living.

(c) Vacancies shall be immediately filled by the Governor for the unexpired portion of the terms in which they occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 183, Sec. 3.   (SB 1387)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

68.

Each member of the board shall receive, for each day’s attendance at each meeting of the board, a per diem of fifty dollars ($50) and shall receive the same per diem for each day spent on official duties assigned by the board. In addition, each member shall be reimbursed for his necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of his official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

69.

(a) The board shall hold meetings at times and at places as shall be determined by it.

(b) Special meetings may be called at any time by the chairperson or by the executive officer at the request of any four members, upon notice specifying the matters to be acted upon at the meeting, but no other matters shall be acted upon at these special meetings which were not so noticed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 138, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

69.7.

In the budget submitted by the department pursuant to Section 13320 of the Government Code, the board shall have its budget separately stated. Those funds allocated for the board shall be used solely as determined by the members of the board, for the board’s operation and other necessary purposes as the board may determine.
